Utah statutes.
75-5b-204.   Exclusive and continuing jurisdiction.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 75-5b-203, a court that has appointed
a guardian or issued a protective order consistent with this chapter has
exclusive and continuing jurisdiction over the proceeding until it is
terminated by the court or the appointment or order expires by its own terms.
